Maine, session 132, LD1520.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶AAA is enacted to read:
AAA. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, to the extent included in
federal adjusted gross income, any amount received as reimbursement for miles driven
in service of a charitable organization above the amount that the taxpayer would be
eligible for if the miles were driven for business purposes as determined using the
standard reimbursement rate for miles driven for business purposes as provided by the
United States Internal Revenue Service and as applicable to that tax year.